District of Columbia statutes.
32-731

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(2)

“Covered individual” means a person whose coverage under an employer’s health benefits plan is continued under this chapter.

(3)

“Health benefits plan” means any accident and health insurance policy or certificate, hospital and medical services corporation contract, health maintenance organization subscriber contract, plan provided by a multiple employer welfare arrangement, or plan provided by another benefit arrangement. The term “health benefit plan” does not mean accident only, credit, or disability insurance; coverage of Medicare services or federal employee health plans, pursuant to contracts with the United States government; Medicare supplemental or long-term care insurance; dental only or vision only insurance; specified disease insurance; hospital confinement indemnity coverage; limited benefit health coverage; coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of a worker’s compensation or similar law; automobile medical payment insurance; medical expense and loss of income benefits; or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(4)

“Health insurer” means any person that provides one or more health benefit plans or insurance in the District of Columbia, including an insurer, a hospital and medical services corporation, a fraternal benefit society, a health maintenance organization, a multiple employer welfare arrangement, or any other person providing a plan of health insurance subject to the authority of the Commissioner.

June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-149, § 2, 49 DCR 4233
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(ii), 51 DCR 2817
D.C. Law 15-166, in par. (1), substituted “Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Commissioner of the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation”.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Continuation of Health Coverage Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-108, April 13, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4056).
For temporary (90 day) addition of §§ 32-731 to 32-734, see §§ 2 to 5 of Continuation of Health Coverage Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-214, December 17, 2001, 49 DCR 377).
For temporary (90 day) addition of §§ 32-731 to 32-734, see § 2 of Continuation of Health Coverage Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-304, March 25, 2002, 49 DCR 3399).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(ii) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).